Hawaii statutes.
§466-39 Appeals. (a) A firm shall
have thirty calendar days after the filing of the peer review compliance
reporting form to appeal a "pass with deficiency" or a
"fail" rating that may result in the denial, termination, or
nonrenewal of a permit to practice.

(b) A firm may also appeal the findings or
conclusions of any peer review process under this part that results in the
denial, termination, or nonrenewal of a permit to practice.

(c) The appeal process under this section
shall include the postponement of any adverse action during the pendency of the
appeal. [L 2012, c 324, pt of §1; am L 2016, c 145, §5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next